Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Chapter 75. Fisheries Business License and Taxes.

Administrative Code. —

For fisheries business tax, see 15 AAC 75.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A native business enterprise incorporated under the Indian Reorganization Act of 1934, 48 Stat. 987,
25 U.S.C. § 476 et seq., whether it be a cooperative store or a cannery, doing business outside of an Indian reservation is subject to the Alaska Business License Act,
AS 43.70, and this chapter, even though those businesses may be operated by Alaska Natives who have incorporated under the Indian Reorganization Act of 1934. Conversely, such native business enterprises doing business within a reservation are not subject to these state taxes.
1978 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.